Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.236

Commute trip reduction—Institutions of higher education—Exemption.

All institutions of higher education as defined under RCW 28B.10.016 are exempt from the requirements under RCW 43.01.240.

[ 1998 c 344 s 8; 1997 c 273 s 3; 1995 c 215 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Findings—1998 c 344: See note following RCW 28B.10.029.